Nebraska, session 109, LB886.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB886 LB886
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-474, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-474 (1) Operator's or driver's license means shall mean any
license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of
this state, including:
(a) (1) Any replacement license or instruction permit;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the (2)
The privilege of any person to drive a motor vehicle whether such person
holds a valid license;
(c) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any (3)
Any nonresident's operating privilege which shall mean the privilege
conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the
operation of a motor vehicle in this state by such person or the use in
this state of a vehicle owned by such person;
(d) (4) An employment driving permit issued as provided by sections
60-4,129 and 60-4,130; and
(e) (5) A medical hardship driving permit issued as provided by
sections 60-4,130.01 and 60-4,130.02.
(2) Operator's or driver's license does not include any license,
permit, or document that is issued to any person who is not a United
States citizen and does not have lawful status in the United States.
Sec. 2. Section 60-488, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-488 (1) A nonresident shall not be prevented from operating a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state during the period within
which he or she may lawfully operate such motor vehicle in the state
under the general motor vehicle laws of this state, but in no event shall
such immunity extend:
(a) Beyond beyond a period of thirty days continuous residence in
the State of Nebraska; or .
(b) To any person who is not a United States citizen and does not
-2-

LB886 LB886
2026 2026
have lawful status in the United States.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to the following
limitations:
(a) Such nonresident shall be duly licensed under the motor vehicle
laws of the state of his or her residence or have complied with the laws
of the state of his or her residence relating to the registration or
licensing of motor vehicles and conformed to the laws of such state of
residence in relation to the operators of motor vehicles;
(b) A nonresident who is serving in this state on active duty as a
member of the United States Armed Forces, or the spouse of any such
person or a dependent of such member of the armed forces, shall be exempt
from the licensing requirements of this state if he or she is duly
licensed under the laws of the state of his or her residence;
(c) A nonresident who is considered to be a full-time student in any
institution of postsecondary education in this state shall be exempt from
the licensing requirements of this state if such person is duly licensed
under the laws of the state of his or her residence; and
(d) A nonresident certified by the Department of Labor as engaged in
temporary agricultural employment in Nebraska for a period of not to
exceed sixty days may be granted an additional thirty days' immunity if a
similar immunity is granted by the state of his or her permanent
residence to residents of Nebraska while temporarily employed in
agricultural employment in such state.
Sec. 3. Original sections 60-474 and 60-488, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-